District of Columbia statutes.
7-743.04

Advisory Committee on Naturopathic Medicine.

(a)

There is established an Advisory Committee on Naturopathic Medicine to consist of 3 members as follows:

(1)

The Director of the Department of Health, or his or her designee;

(2)

A licensed physician with experience in naturopathic medicine or in working with naturopathic physicians; and

(3)

A licensed naturopathic physician.

(b)

Of the appointees to the Advisory Committee on Naturopathic Medicine other than the Director, one shall serve an initial term of 2 years and one shall serve an initial term of 3 years. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of 3 years.

(c)

(1)

The Advisory Committee on Naturopathic Medicine shall develop and submit to the Board of Medicine guidelines for licensing naturopathic physicians and regulating the practice of naturopathic medicine in the District.

(2)

(A)

Guidelines approved by the Board of Medicine § 3-1202.03 shall remain in effect until revised guidelines are submitted to and approved by the Board of Medicine.

(B)

The Advisory Committee on Naturopathic Medicine shall submit revised guidelines to the Board of Medicine by June 22, 2015.

(3)

The Advisory Committee on Naturopathic Medicine shall meet at least annually to review the guidelines and make necessary revisions for submission to the Board of Medicine.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4944
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 202(b), 62 DCR 1884